Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.49
Reciprocal exemption.

Sales tax shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of property or services the sale, purchase, or use of which has been taxed to that taxpayer in another state, territory, or possession of the United States when such other state, territory, or possession grants a reciprocal exclusion or an exemption to similar transactions in this state.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 64;

Laws 2004, LB 1017, § 18.